Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2901
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-2901 to 25-2921 shall be known and may be cited as the Dispute Resolution Act.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 922, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 1.